Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0106.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 811kk. (1) The secretary of state shall develop under section 811e and issue under section 811f a fund-raising plate recognizing the need to address the overpopulation of this stateâs companion animals and to support the humane care and health care of homeless and abused animals in this stateâs shelters and rescues. The secretary of state, in conjunction with the Michigan Pet Alliance, shall design the fund-raising plate authorized in this section. (2) The protecting Michiganâs pets fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. The state treasurer shall be the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (3) The secretary of state shall transfer the donation money from the sale of fund-raising plates under subsection (1) to the state treasurer, who shall credit the donation money to the fund established under subsection (2). (4) The state treasurer shall disburse money in the fund established under subsection (2) on a quarterly basis to the Michigan Pet Alliance. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor